Utah statutes.
15-8-2.   Purpose -- Rules of construction.

(1)  This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

(2)  The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are to:

(a)  define, simplify, and clarify the law governing consumer rental purchase agreements;

(b)  provide certain disclosures to consumers who enter into consumer rental purchase agreements, and further consumer understanding of the terms of consumer rental purchase agreements;

(c)  protect consumers against unfair practices;

(d)  permit and encourage the development of fair and economically sound rental purchase practices; and

(e)  make the law on consumer rental purchase agreements, including administrative rules, more uniform among the various consumer credit code jurisdictions.



Enacted by Chapter 251, 1993 General Session

